North Carolina, session 2025, SB506.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction an additional sixteen million two hundred thousand dollars ($16,200,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and an additional twenty million one hundred
thousand dollars ($20,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to bring the total
revised net appropriation to the Department to twenty-seven million one hundred thousand
dollars ($27,100,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and thirty-one million
dollars ($31,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Department to
allocate to public school units participating in the Advanced Teaching Roles program to provide
salary supplements under G.S. 115C-310.13.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction an additional one million dollars ($1,000,000) in recurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to bring the total revised net appropriation to the Department to six million
five hundred thousand dollars ($6,500,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for
the Department to expand the Advanced Teaching Roles program in accordance with Article 20A
of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*S506-v-1*